Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2209.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2007-I. Communism and socialism education.(a) One credit education program required.--Beginning in the 2027-2028 school year and in each school year thereafter, an institution of higher education shall establish and implement a one credit education program on the dangers and realities of communism and socialism in a free society. The course shall be required for all students attending an institution of higher education that receives State funding.1234567891011121314151617181920 (b) Curriculum.-- An institution of higher education that receives State funding may develop a curriculum or use, in part or in whole, an already established curriculum for the education program required under subsection (a). The education program shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in the following subjects:(1) The definition of capitalism, communism and socialism. The instruction shall include that:(i) c apitalism is not a totalizing ideology, but rather works across historical periods and in diverse contexts on the idea that individuals can and should be able to choose how to use resources, such as amassing wealth, investing in innovation or giving to charities;(ii) under the pretense of a classless, egalitarian society, communist regimes in practice rely on force, use brutality and repress speech, religion, assembly and all other rights and freedoms; and(iii) Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels argued that socialism was an intermediate step between free market capitalism and the ultimate goal of communism. Lenin concurred that socialism was the first, or lower, phase of communist society.(iv) The ideological father of fascism and intellectual author of the "doctrine of fascism," Giovanni Gentile was inspired by thinkers such as Karl Marx and viewed fascism as a form of socialism. By ideological bases, fascism is a national collective while socialism is an international collective.(2) An overview of the real-world application of communism and socialism in:20260HB2209PN2903 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) China.(ii) Cuba.(iii) Laos.(iv) North Korea.(v) The former Union of Soviet Socialist Republics.(vi) Vietnam.(vii) Venezuela.(viii) Any other past or present communist or socialist government.(3) The systematic destruction of civil liberties, personal freedoms and freedom of the press in communist and socialist societies.(4) A free market and capitalist society in comparison to a communist society.(5) The role of government in communist societies.(6) Marxism, the Communist Manifesto, written by Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, and other significant communist ideologies.(7) An overview of the history of communism in the modern world, including:(i) World War II;(ii) the Korean War;(iii) the Vietnam War;(iv) the Cold War; and(v) any other significant world event relating to communism and socialism.(8) Current communist regimes and nations at risk of instituting a communist government.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20260HB2209PN2903 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Capitalism." An economic system characterized by:(1) private or corporate ownership of capital goods;(2) investments that are determined by private decisions; and(3) prices, production and the distribution of goods and property that are determined mainly by competition in a free market."Communism." An ideology and system of centralized political power in which a single-party dictatorship abolishes private property and controls the means of production and the distribution of goods and services."Fascism." An ideology and system that:(1) puts nation and, often, race above the individual; (2) is characterized by severe economic and social regimentation and by forcible suppression of the opposition; and(3) promotes planned economies in which it is the government that determines what, how much and how to produce."Institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A.(2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G.(3) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(4) A State-related institution as defined in section 2001-C.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(6) Any accredited private or independent college or university.20260HB2209PN2903 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Any private licensed school as defined in section 2 of the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act."Socialism." An ideology and system of political and economic organization in which major industries and other sectors, such as health care and education, are owned or controlled by the government rather than by individuals and private companies."State funding." Any State grant or loan authorized by a law of this Commonwealth that an institution of higher education receives either directly or indirectly, including any State funding through the act of August 7, 1963 (P.L.549, No.290), referred to as the Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency Act, or the act of July 18, 1974 (P.L.483, No.174), known as The Institutional Assistance Grants Act . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2209PN2903 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516